Missouri, session 2026, HB2063.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 28, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
2 known as section 28.950, to read as follows:
28.950. All printed materials published by the secretary of state's office and
2 made available to the public shall also be published in Spanish. Such Spanish materials
3 shall be made available upon request.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.